Tennessee, session 114, SB1232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(p)
(1) Notwithstanding subsections (g), (k), and (m), effective July 1, 2025,
for purposes of this subsection (p), "eligible petitioner" means a person who:
(A) Is seeking expunction of an offense that:
(i) Is eligible for expunction under subdivision (g)(1); and
(ii) Occurred at least ten (10) years after the person's
conviction for an offense under § 55-10-401;
(B) Has fulfilled all requirements of the sentence imposed by the
court for the offense the person is seeking to expunge, including:
(i) Payment of all fines, restitution, court costs, and other
assessments for the offense;
(ii) Completion of any term of imprisonment or probation
for the offense; and
(iii) Meeting all conditions of supervised or unsupervised
release for the offense;
(C) Has not previously been granted expunction under subsection
(g), subsection (k), or subsection (m); and
SB1232
001083
- 1 -

(D) Has not been convicted of an offense under § 55-10-401
more than one (1) time.
(2) A person may petition for expunction of an offense under this
subsection (p) only one (1) time.
(3) Subdivisions (g)(3)-(6), (8), (12), and (13) apply to a petition filed
under this subsection (p).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001083